Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.425

Qualified residential treatment program—Placement—Hearing.

If a child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in this chapter, the court shall, within sixty days of placement, hold a hearing to:

(1) Consider the assessment required under RCW 13.34.420 and submitted as part of the department's social study, and any related documentation;

(2) Determine whether placement in foster care can meet the child's needs or if placement in another available placement setting best meets the child's needs in the least restrictive environment; and

(3) Approve or disapprove the child's placement in the qualified residential treatment program.

[ 2019 c 172 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 172 ss 3, 4, and 10-15: See note following RCW 13.34.420.